Missouri, session 2026, HB3430.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 191.117, to read as follows:
191.117. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Lori Zena
Baker Act".
2. There is hereby established in the department of health and senior services a
"Sickle Cell Standing Committee" as a subcommittee of the Missouri genetic advisory
committee. The committee shall consist of the following members:
(1) One member who is a licensed physician with experience in the diagnosis and
treatment of sickle cell disease and who shall serve as chair of the committee;
(2) One member who has sickle cell disease or is a family member of a person
with sickle cell disease;
(3) One member with expertise in sickle cell disease research;
(4) One member from a leading sickle cell disease organization;
(5) One member with expertise in minority health; and
(6) One member from each hemoglobinopathy center that contracts with the
department.
3. The members of the committee shall be appointed by the director of the
department of health and senior services. Members shall serve on the committee
without compensation or reimbursement for expenses incurred.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3430 2
4. The committee shall:
(1) Assess the impact of sickle cell disease on urban communities in the state of
Missouri;
(2) Examine the existing services and resources addressing the needs of persons
with sickle cell disease; and
(3) Develop recommendations to provide educational services to schools on the
traits of sickle cell disease and its effects.
5. The committee shall include an examination of the following in its assessment
and recommendations required under subsection 4 of this section:
(1) Trends in state sickle cell disease populations and their needs including, but
not limited to, the state's role in providing assistance;
(2) Existing services and resources; and
(3) Needed state policies or responses including, but not limited to, directions for
the provision of clear and coordinated services and supports to persons living with sickle
cell disease and strategies to address any identified gaps in services.
6. The committee shall hold a minimum of one meeting in three urban regions of
the state to seek public input.
7. The committee shall submit a report of its findings and any recommendations
to the general assembly and the governor no later than December 31, 2027.
8. After December 31, 2027, the committee shall continue to meet at the request
of the chair and at a minimum of one time annually to continue the study of sickle cell
disease in this state, to consider the impact of the committee recommendations, and to
provide an annual supplemental report on the findings to the governor and the general
assembly.
✔